District of Columbia statutes.
1-811.05

Special requirements upon discontinuation of Trust Fund.

(a)

Successor to Trustee. —

If the Secretary determines that the Trust Fund shall be discontinued after it has been depleted of assets, the Secretary shall appoint a successor to the Trustee to administer the requirements of this chapter, with the same powers and subject to the same conditions as were applicable to the Trustee.

(b)

Continuing application of terms and conditions. —

The methodology selected by the Secretary under § 1-811.04(b), and the payment of benefits pursuant to such methodology, shall be subject to the same arrangements, terms, and conditions as were applicable under this chapter to the Trust Fund and the benefits paid under the Trust Fund (including provisions relating to the treatment of the Trust Fund under certain laws).

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 727, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11055
1981 Ed., § 1-766.5.